NLP - Project/magahi/magahi-val.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="sg"       c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"       c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>   
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>   
    <sdef n="o"       c="Oblique"/>
    <sdef n="d"       c="Direct"/>
    <sdef n="p3"       c="Third Person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"       c="Second Person"/>
    <sdef n="p1"       c="First Person"/>
    <sdef n="eo"       c="Emphasis with only"/>
    <sdef n="adj"		c="Adjective"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
	<pardef n = "b">
	  <e><p><l>AlikA</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>alikain</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "laiki">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>no</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "mAi">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>no</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "r">
	  <e><p><l>Awo</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>Awo</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>Awo</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>Awo</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "rawi">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "Oraw">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>anao</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "BAs">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "gudZiy">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "sakwi">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "qwu">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "bahu">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>no</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "l">
	  <e><p><l>Ovo</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>Ovo</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>Ovo</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>avano</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "mAz">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ano</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "PotoM">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "BUiM">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ano</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "BOM">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ano</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "BarasaiM">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>no</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "Bor">
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "Poto">
	  <e><p><l>O</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>O</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>O</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>O</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "laik">
	  <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
